Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-502
Reclamation districts; declaration of policy.

It is therefor declared to be the policy of the State of Nebraska to (1) control, make use of and apply to beneficial use all available waters of this state to a direct and supplemental use of such waters for domestic, manufacturing, irrigation, power and other beneficial uses, (2) obtain from water of the state the highest benefit for domestic uses and irrigation of lands in Nebraska, (3) cooperate with the United States under the federal reclamation laws now or hereinafter enacted and other agencies of the United States Government in the construction and financing of works in the State of Nebraska as herein defined and for the operation and maintenance thereof, and (4) promote the greater prosperity and general welfare of the people of the State of Nebraska by encouraging the organization of reclamation districts as provided in sections 46-501 to 46-573.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 1(2), p. 524.